Utah statutes.
63A-14-707.   Communications of commission members.

(1)  As used in this section, "third party" means a person who is not a member of the commission or staff to the commission.

(2)  While a complaint is under review by the commission, a member of the commission may not initiate, engage in, or consider any communications concerning the complaint with a third party unless:

(a)  the communication is expressly permitted under the procedures established by this chapter; or

(b)  the communication is made by the third party, in writing, simultaneously to:

(i)  all members of the commission; and

(ii)  a staff member of the commission.

(3)  While the commission is reviewing a complaint under this chapter, a commission member may communicate outside of the meetings or deliberations with another member of, or staff to, the commission, if the member's communication does not materially compromise the member's responsibility to independently review and make decisions in relation to the complaint.



Enacted by Chapter 426, 2013 General Session

